California statutes. Public Resources Code
(5) The transit priority project does not have a significant effect on historical resources pursuant to Section 21084.1.

(6) The transit priority project site is not subject to any of the following:

(A) A wildland fire hazard, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, unless the applicable general plan or zoning ordinance contains provisions to mitigate the risk of a wildland fire hazard.

(B) An unusually high risk of fire or explosion from materials stored or used on nearby properties.

(C) Risk of a public health exposure at a level that would exceed the standards established by any state or federal agency.

(D) Seismic risk as a result of being within a delineated earthquake fault zone, as determined pursuant to Section 2622, or a seismic hazard zone, as determined pursuant to Section 2696, unless the applicable general plan or zoning ordinance contains provisions to mitigate the risk of an earthquake fault or seismic hazard zone.

(E) Landslide hazard, flood plain, flood way, or restriction zone, unless the applicable general plan or zoning ordinance contains provisions to mitigate the risk of a landslide or flood.

(7) The transit priority project site is not located on developed open space.

(A) For the purposes of this paragraph, “developed open space” means land that meets all of the following criteria:

(i) Is publicly owned, or financed in whole or in part by public funds.

(ii) Is generally open to, and available for use by, the public.

(iii) Is predominantly lacking in structural development other than structures associated with open spaces, including, but not limited to, playgrounds, swimming pools, ballfields, enclosed child play areas, and picnic facilities.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “developed open space” includes land that has been designated for acquisition by a public agency for developed open space, but does not include lands acquired with public funds dedicated to the acquisition of land for housing purposes.

(8) The buildings in the transit priority project are 15 percent more energy efficient than required by
 Chapter 6 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations and the buildings and landscaping are designed to achieve 25 percent less water usage than the average household use in the region.

(b) The transit priority project meets all of the following land use criteria:

(1) The site of the transit priority project is not more than eight acres in total area.

(2) The transit priority project does not contain more than 200 residential units.

(3) The transit priority project does not result in any net loss in the number of affordable housing units within the project area.

(4) The transit priority project does not include any single level building that exceeds 75,000 square feet.

(5) Any applicable mitigation measures or performance standards or criteria set forth in the prior environmental impact reports, and adopted in findings, have been or will be incorporated into the transit priority project.

(6) The transit priority project is determined not to conflict with nearby operating industrial uses.

(7) The transit priority project is located within one-half mile of a rail transit station or a ferry terminal included in a regional transportation plan or within one-quarter mile of a high-quality transit corridor included in a regional transportation plan.

(c) The transit priority project meets at least one of the following three criteria:

(1) The transit priority
 project meets both of the following:

(A) At least 20 percent of the housing will be sold to families of moderate income, or not less than 10 percent of the housing will be rented to families of low income, or not less than 5 percent of the housing is rented to families of very low income.

(B) The transit priority project developer provides sufficient legal commitments to the appropriate local agency to ensure the continued availability and use of the housing units for very low, low-, and moderate-income households at monthly housing costs with an affordable housing cost or affordable rent, as defined in Section 50052.5 or 50053 of the Health and Safety Code, respectively, for the period required by the applicable financing. Rental units shall be affordable for at least 55 years. Ownership units shall be subject to resale restrictions or equity sharing requirements for at least 30
 years.

(2) The transit priority project developer has paid or will pay in-lieu fees pursuant to a local ordinance in an amount sufficient to result in the development of an equivalent number of units that would otherwise be required pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The transit priority project provides public open space equal to or greater than five acres per 1,000 residents of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 95.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21155.2.

(a) A transit priority project that has incorporated all feasible mitigation measures, performance standards, or criteria set forth in the prior applicable environmental impact reports and adopted in findings made pursuant to Section 21081, shall be eligible for either the provisions of subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) A transit priority project that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a) may be reviewed through a sustainable communities environmental assessment as follows:

(1) An initial study shall be prepared to identify all significant or potentially significant impacts of the transit priority project, other than those which do not need to be reviewed pursuant to Section 21159.28 based on substantial evidence in light of the whole record. The initial study shall identify any cumulative effects that have been adequately addressed and mitigated pursuant to the requirements of this division in prior applicable certified environmental impact reports. Where the lead agency determines that a cumulative effect has been adequately addressed and mitigated, that cumulative effect shall not be treated as cumulatively considerable for the purposes of this subdivision.

(2) The sustainable communities environmental assessment shall contain measures that either avoid or mitigate to a level of insignificance all potentially significant or significant effects of the project required to be identified in the initial study.

(3) A draft of the sustainable communities environmental assessment shall be circulated for public comment for a period of not less than 30 days. Notice shall be provided in the same manner as required for an environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21092.

(4) Prior to acting on the sustainable communities environmental assessment, the lead agency shall consider all comments received.

(5) A sustainable communities environmental assessment may be approved by the lead agency after conducting a public hearing, reviewing the comments received, and finding that:

(A) All potentially significant or significant effects required to be identified in the initial study have been identified and analyzed.

(B) With respect to each significant effect on the environment required to be identified in the initial study, either of the following apply:

(i) Changes or alterations have been required in or incorporated into the project that avoid or mitigate the significant effects to a level of insignificance.

(ii) Those changes or alterations are within the responsibility and jurisdiction of another public agency and have been, or can and should be, adopted by that other agency.

(6) The legislative body of the lead agency shall conduct the public hearing or a planning commission may conduct the public hearing if local ordinances allow a direct appeal of approval of a document prepared pursuant to this division to the legislative body subject to a fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(7) The lead agency’s decision to review and approve a transit priority project with a sustainable communities environmental assessment shall be reviewed under the substantial evidence standard.

(c) A transit priority project that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a) may be reviewed by an environmental impact report that complies with all of the following:

(1) An initial study shall be prepared to identify all significant or potentially significant effects of the transit priority project other than those that do not need to be reviewed pursuant to Section 21159.28 based upon substantial evidence in light of the whole record. The initial study shall identify any cumulative effects that have been adequately addressed and mitigated pursuant to the requirements of this division in prior applicable certified environmental impact reports. Where the lead agency determines that a cumulative effect has been adequately addressed and mitigated, that cumulative effect shall not be treated as cumulatively considerable for the purposes of this subdivision.

(2) An environmental impact report prepared pursuant to this subdivision need only address the significant or potentially significant effects of the transit priority project on the environment identified pursuant to paragraph (1). It is not required to analyze off-site alternatives to the transit priority project. It shall otherwise comply with the requirements of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 728, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21155.3.

(a) The legislative body of a local jurisdiction may adopt traffic mitigation measures that would apply to transit priority projects. These measures shall be adopted or amended after a public hearing and may include requirements for the installation of traffic control improvements, street or road improvements, and contributions to road improvement or transit funds, transit passes for future residents, or other measures that will avoid or mitigate the traffic impacts of those transit priority projects.

 (b) (1) A transit priority project that is seeking a discretionary approval is not required to comply with any additional mitigation measures required by paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081, for the traffic impacts of that project on intersections, streets, highways, freeways, or mass transit, if the local jurisdiction issuing that discretionary approval has adopted traffic mitigation measures in accordance with this section.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not restrict the authority of a local jurisdiction to adopt feasible mitigation measures with respect to the effects of a project on public health or on pedestrian or bicycle safety.

(c) The legislative body shall review its traffic mitigation measures and update them as needed at least every five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 728, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21155.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a residential, employment center, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21099, or mixed-use development project, including any subdivision, or any zoning, change that meets all of the following criteria is exempt from the requirements of this division:

(1) The project is proposed within a transit priority area, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 21099.

(2) The project is undertaken to implement and is consistent with a specific plan for which an environmental impact report has been certified.

(3) The
 project is consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the project area in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy for which the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, has accepted a metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets.

(b) Further environmental review shall be conducted only if any of the events specified in Section 21166 have occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 386, Sec. 6.   (SB 743)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Housing Sustainability Districts [21155.10. - 21155.11.]

21155.10.

A lead agency shall prepare an environmental impact report when designating a housing sustainability district pursuant to Section 66201 of the Government Code to identify and mitigate, to the extent feasible, environmental impacts resulting from the designation. The environmental impact report shall identify mitigation measures that may be undertaken by housing projects in the housing sustainability district to mitigate the environmental impacts identified by the environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 371, Sec. 3.   (AB 73)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Stats. 2017, Ch. 371, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21155.11.

This division does not apply to a housing project undertaken in a housing sustainability district designated by a local government if all of the following are met:

(a) The lead agency has certified an environmental impact report for the housing sustainability district, and the Department of Housing and Community Development has approved the housing sustainability district pursuant to Section 66202 of the Government Code, within 10 years of the lead agency’s review of the housing project.

(b) The housing project meets the conditions specified in the designation for the housing sustainability district.

(c) The housing project is required to implement appropriate mitigation measures identified in the environmental impact report prepared pursuant to Section 21155.10 to mitigate environmental impacts identified by that environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 371, Sec. 3.   (AB 73)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Stats. 2017, Ch. 371, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Streamlined Environmental Review [21156. - 21159.33.]



  ARTICLE 1. Findings [21156. - 21156.]

21156.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter that a master environmental impact report shall evaluate the cumulative impacts, growth inducing impacts, and irreversible significant effects on the environment of subsequent projects to the greatest extent feasible. The Legislature further intends that the environmental review of subsequent projects be substantially reduced to the extent that the project impacts have been reviewed and appropriate mitigation measures are set forth in a certified master environmental impact report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1130, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Master Environmental Impact Report [21157. - 21157.7.]

21157.

(a) A master environmental impact report may be prepared for any one of the following projects:

(1) A general plan, element, general plan amendment, or specific plan.

(2) A project that consists of smaller individual projects that will be carried out in phases.

(3) A rule or regulation that will be implemented by subsequent projects.

(4) A project that will be carried out or approved pursuant to a development agreement.

(5) A public or private project that will be carried out or approved pursuant to, or in furtherance of, a redevelopment plan.

(6) A state highway project or mass transit project that will be subject to multiple stages of review or approval.

(7) A regional transportation plan or congestion management plan.

(8) A plan proposed by a local agency for the reuse of a federal military base or reservation that has been closed or that is proposed for closure.

(9) Regulations adopted by the Fish and Game Commission for the regulation of hunting and fishing.

(10) A plan for district projects to be undertaken by a school district, that also complies with applicable school facilities requirements, including, but not limited to, the requirements of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 17210) of Chapter 1 of Part 10.5 of, Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(b) When a lead agency prepares a master environmental impact report, the document shall include all of the following:

(1) A detailed statement as required by Section 21100.

(2) A description of anticipated subsequent projects that would be within the scope of the master environmental impact report, that contains sufficient information with regard to the kind, size, intensity, and location of the subsequent projects, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The specific type of project anticipated to be undertaken.

(B) The maximum and minimum intensity of any anticipated subsequent project, such as the number of residences in a residential development, and, with regard to a public works facility, its anticipated capacity and service area.

(C) The anticipated location and alternative locations for any development projects.

(D) A capital outlay or capital improvement program, or other scheduling or implementing device that governs the submission and approval of subsequent projects.

(3) A description of potential impacts of anticipated subsequent projects for which there is not sufficient information reasonably available to support a full assessment of potential impacts in the master environmental impact report. This description shall not be construed as a limitation on the impacts which may be considered in a focused environmental impact report.

(c) Lead agencies may develop and implement a fee program in accordance with applicable provisions of law to generate the revenue necessary to prepare a master environmental impact report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 882, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21157.1.

The preparation and certification of a master environmental impact report, if prepared and certified consistent with this division, may allow for the limited review of subsequent projects that were described in the master environmental impact report as being within the scope of the report, in accordance with the following requirements:

(a) The lead agency for a subsequent project shall be the lead agency or any responsible agency identified in the master environmental impact report.

(b) The lead agency shall prepare an initial study on any proposed subsequent project. This initial study shall analyze whether the subsequent project may cause any significant effect on the environment that was not examined in the master environmental impact report and whether the subsequent project was described in the master environmental impact report as being within the scope of the report.

(c) If the lead agency, based on the initial study, determines that a proposed subsequent project will have no additional significant effect on the environment, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 21158, that was not identified in the master environmental impact report and that no new or additional mitigation measures or alternatives may be required, the lead agency shall make a written finding based upon the information contained in the initial study that the subsequent project is within the scope of the project covered by the master environmental impact report. No new environmental document nor findings pursuant to Section 21081 shall be required by this division. Prior to approving or carrying out the proposed subsequent project, the lead agency shall provide notice of this fact pursuant to Section 21092 and incorporate all feasible mitigation measures or feasible alternatives set forth in the master environmental impact report which are appropriate to the project. Whenever a lead agency approves or determines to carry out any subsequent project pursuant to this section, it shall file a notice pursuant to Section 21108 or 21152.

(d) Where a lead agency cannot make the findings required in subdivision (c), the lead agency shall prepare, pursuant to Section 21157.7, either a mitigated negative declaration or environmental impact report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1294, Sec. 13.   Effective October 1, 1994.   Note: October 1, 1994, is the date that Ch. 1294 became law without the Governor's signature.)
-------------------------------------------

21157.5.

(a) A proposed mitigated negative declaration shall be prepared for any proposed subsequent project if both of the following occur:

(1) An initial study has identified potentially new or additional significant effects on the environment that were not analyzed in the master environmental impact report.

(2) Feasible mitigation measures or alternatives will be incorporated to revise the proposed subsequent project, before the negative declaration is released for public review, in order to avoid the effects or mitigate the effects to a point where clearly no significant effect on the environment will occur.

(b) If there is substantial evidence in light of the whole record before the lead agency that the proposed subsequent project may have a significant effect on the environment and a mitigated negative declaration is not prepared, the lead agency shall prepare an environmental impact report or a focused environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21158.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1130, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21157.6.

(a) The master environmental impact report shall not be used for the purposes of this chapter if either of the following has occurred: 

(1) The certification of the master environmental impact report occurred more than five years prior to the filing of an application for the subsequent project.

(2) The filing of an application for the subsequent project occurs following the certification of the master environmental impact report, and the approval of a project that was not described in the master environmental impact report, may affect the adequacy of the environmental review in the master environmental impact report for any subsequent project.

(b) A master environmental impact report that was certified more than five years prior to the filing of an application for the subsequent project may be used for purposes of this chapter to review a subsequent project that was described in the master environmental impact report if the lead agency reviews the adequacy of the master environmental impact report and does either of the following:

(1) Finds that no substantial changes have occurred with respect to the circumstances under which the master environmental impact report was certified or that no new information, which was not known and could not have been known at the time that the master environmental impact report was certified as complete, has become available.

(2) Prepares an initial study and, pursuant to the findings of the initial study, does either of the following:

(A) Certifies a subsequent or supplemental environmental impact report that has been either incorporated into the previously certified master environmental impact report or references any deletions, additions, or any other modifications to the previously certified master environmental impact report. 

(B) Approves a mitigated negative declaration that addresses substantial changes that have occurred with respect to the circumstances under which the master environmental impact report was certified or the new information that was not known and could not have been known at the time the master environmental impact report was certified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21157.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, a master environmental impact report is a document prepared in accordance with subdivision (c) for the projects described in subdivision (b) that, upon certification, is followed by review of subsequent projects as provided in Sections 21157.1 and 21157.5.

(b) A master environmental impact report may be prepared for a plan adopted by the Department of Transportation for improvements to regional segments of Highway 99 funded pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8879.23 of the Government Code, to streamline, coordinate, and improve environmental review.

(c) The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A detailed statement as required by Section 21100.

(2) A description of the anticipated highway improvements along Highway 99 that would be within the scope of the master environmental impact report, that contains sufficient information about all phases of the Highway 99 construction activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The specific types of improvements that will be undertaken.

(B) The anticipated location and alternative locations for any of the Highway 99 improvements, including overpasses, bridges, railroad crossings, and interchanges.

(C) A capital outlay or capital improvement program, or other scheduling or implementing device that governs the construction activities associated with the Highway 99 improvements.

(d) The Department of Transportation may communicate, coordinate, and consult with the Resources Agency, Wildlife Conservation Board, Department of Fish and Game, Department of Conservation, and other appropriate federal, state, or local governments, including interested stakeholders, to consider and implement mitigation requirements on a regional basis for the projects described in subdivision (b). This may include both of the following:

(1) Identification of priority areas for mitigation, using information from these agencies and departments as well as from other sources.

(2) Utilization of existing conservation programs of the agencies or departments identified in this subdivision, if mitigation under those programs for improvements under this section does not supplant mitigation for a project.

(e) The Department of Transportation may execute an agreement, memorandum of understanding, or other similar instrument to memorialize its understanding of any communication, coordination, or implementation activities with other state agencies for the purposes of meeting mitigation requirements on a regional basis.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in this section is intended to interfere with or prevent the existing authority of an agency or department to carry out its programs, projects, or responsibilities to identify, review, approve, deny, or implement any mitigation requirements, and nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on mitigation requirements for the project, or a limitation on compliance with requirements under this division or any other provision of law.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 21157.6, the master environmental impact report shall not be used for the purposes of this section, if the certification of the master environmental impact report occurred more than seven years prior to the filing of an application for the subsequent project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 503, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Focused Environmental Impact Report [21158. - 21158.5.]

21158.

(a) A focused environmental impact report is an environmental impact report on a subsequent project identified in a master environmental impact report. A focused environmental impact report may be utilized only if the lead agency finds that the analysis in the master environmental impact report of cumulative impacts, growth inducing impacts, and irreversible significant effects on the environment is adequate for the subsequent project. The focused environmental impact report shall incorporate, by reference, the master environmental impact report and analyze only the subsequent project’s additional significant effects on the environment, as defined in subdivision (d), and any new or additional mitigation measures or alternatives that were not identified and analyzed by the master environmental impact report.

(b) The focused environmental impact report need not examine those effects which the lead agency finds were one of the following:

(1) Mitigated or avoided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081 as a result of mitigation measures identified in the master environmental impact report which will be required as part of the approval of the subsequent project.

(2) Examined at a sufficient level of detail in the master environmental impact report to enable those significant environmental effects to be mitigated or avoided by specific revisions to the project, the imposition of conditions, or by other means in connection with the approval of the subsequent project.

(3) Subject to a finding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21081.

(c) A focused environmental impact report on any subsequent project shall analyze any significant effects on the environment where substantial new or additional information shows that the adverse environmental impact may be more significant than was described in the master environmental impact report. The substantial new or additional information may also show that mitigation measures or alternatives identified in the master environmental impact report, which were previously determined to be infeasible, are feasible and will avoid or reduce the significant effects on the environment of the subsequent project to a level of insignificance.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, “additional significant effects on the environment” are those project specific effects on the environment which were not addressed as significant effects on the environment in the master environmental impact report.

(e) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit or abridge the ability of a lead agency to focus upon the issues that are ripe for decision at each level of environmental review, or to exclude duplicative analysis of environmental effects examined in previous environmental impact reports pursuant to Section 21093.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1294, Sec. 16.   Effective October 1, 1994.   Note: October 1, 1994, is the date that Ch. 1294 became law without the Governor's signature.)
-------------------------------------------

21158.1.

When a lead agency is required to prepare an environmental impact report pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 21157.1 or is authorized to prepare a focused environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21158, the lead agency may not rely on subdivision (a) of Section 21080.5 for that purpose even though the lead agency’s regulatory program is otherwise certified in accordance with Section 21080.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 444, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21158.5.

(a) Where a project consists of multiple-family residential development of not more than 100 units or a residential and commercial or retail mixed-use development of not more than 100,000 square feet which complies with all of the following, a focused environmental impact report shall be prepared, notwithstanding that the project was not identified in a master environmental impact report:

(1) Is consistent with a general plan, specific plan, community plan, or zoning ordinance for which an environmental impact report was prepared within five years of the certification of the focused environmental impact report.

(2) The lead agency cannot make the finding described in subdivision (c) of Section 21157.1, a negative declaration or mitigated negative declaration cannot be prepared pursuant to Section 21080, 21157.5, or 21158, and Section 21166 does not apply.

(3) Meets one or more of the following conditions:

(A) The parcel on which the project is to be developed is surrounded by immediately contiguous urban development.

(B) The parcel on which the project is to be developed has been previously developed with urban uses.

(C) The parcel on which the project is to be developed is within one-half mile of an existing rail transit station.

(b) A focused environmental impact report prepared pursuant to this section shall be limited to a discussion of potentially significant effects on the environment specific to the project, or which substantial new information shows will be more significant than described in the prior environmental impact report. No discussion shall be required of alternatives to the project, cumulative impacts of the project, or the growth inducing impacts of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1130, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Expedited Environmental Review for Environmentally Mandated Projects [21159. - 21159.4.]

21159.

(a) An agency listed in Section 21159.4 shall perform, at the time of the adoption of a rule or regulation requiring the installation of pollution control equipment, or a performance standard or treatment requirement, including a rule or regulation that requires the installation of pollution control equipment or a performance standard or treatment requirement pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), an environmental analysis of the reasonably foreseeable methods of compliance. In the preparation of this analysis, the agency may utilize numerical ranges or averages where specific data is not available; however, the agency shall not be required to
 engage in speculation or conjecture. The environmental analysis shall, at minimum, include all of the following:

(1) An analysis of the reasonably foreseeable environmental impacts of the methods of compliance.

(2) An analysis of reasonably foreseeable feasible mitigation measures.

(3) An analysis of reasonably foreseeable alternative means of compliance with the rule or regulation.

(4) For a rule or regulation that requires the installation of pollution control equipment adopted pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), the analysis shall also
 include reasonably foreseeable greenhouse gas emission impacts of compliance with the rule or regulation.

(b) The preparation of an environmental impact report at the time of adopting a rule or regulation pursuant to this division shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(c) The environmental analysis shall take into account a reasonable range of environmental, economic, and technical factors, population and geographic areas, and specific sites.

(d) This section does not require the agency to conduct a project-level analysis.

(e) For purposes of this article, the term “performance standard” includes process or raw material changes or product reformulation.

(f) This section is not intended, and may not be used, to delay the adoption of any rule or regulation for which an analysis is required to be performed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 195, Sec. 2.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.1.

(a) A focused environmental impact report may be utilized if a project meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The project consists solely of the installation of either of the following:

(A) Pollution control equipment required by a rule or regulation of an agency listed in subdivision (a) of Section 21159.4 and other components necessary to complete the installation of that equipment.

(B) Pollution control equipment and other components necessary to complete the installation of that equipment that
 reduces greenhouse gases required by a rule or regulation of an agency listed in Section 21159.4 pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The agency certified an environmental impact report on the rule or regulation or reviewed it pursuant to a certified regulatory program, and, in either case, the review included an assessment of growth inducing impacts and cumulative impacts of, and alternatives to, the project.

(3) The environmental review required by paragraph (2) was completed within five years of certification of the focused environmental impact report.

(4) An environmental impact report is not required pursuant to Section 21166.

(b) The discussion of significant effects on the environment in the focused environmental impact report shall be limited to project-specific potentially significant effects on the environment of the project that were not discussed in the environmental analysis of the rule or regulation required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21159. A discussion of growth-inducing impacts or cumulative impacts shall not be required in the focused environmental impact report, and the discussion of alternatives shall be limited to a discussion of alternative means of compliance, if any, with the rule or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 195, Sec. 3.   (AB 1846)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.2.

(a) If a project consists solely of compliance with a performance standard or treatment requirement imposed by an agency listed in Section 21159.4, the lead agency for the compliance project shall, to the greatest extent feasible, utilize the environmental analysis required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 21159 in the preparation of a negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, or environmental impact report on the compliance project or in otherwise fulfilling its responsibilities under this division. The use of numerical averages or ranges in an environmental analysis shall not relieve a lead agency of its obligations under this division to identify and evaluate the environmental effects of a compliance project.

(b) If the lead agency determines that an environmental impact report on the compliance project is required, the lead agency shall prepare an environmental impact report which addresses only the project-specific issues related to the compliance project or other issues that were not discussed in sufficient detail in the environmental analysis to enable the lead agency to fulfill its responsibilities under Section 21100 or 21151, as applicable. The mitigation measures imposed by the lead agency for the project shall relate only to the significant effects on the environment to be mitigated. The discussion of alternatives shall be limited to a discussion of alternative means of compliance, if any, with the rule or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1130, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21159.3.

In the preparation of any environmental impact report pursuant to Section 21159.1 or 21159.2, the following deadlines shall apply:

(a) A lead agency shall determine whether an environmental impact report should be prepared within 30 days of its determination that the application for the project is complete.
